Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4439.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1: Title This Act shall be known as "The Fair Charter School Reimbursement
Act"
Section 2: Purpose The purpose of this Act is to ensure equitable charter school tuition
reimbursement for municipalities based on their financial capacity. This Act seeks to amend
Section 89 of Chapter 71 of the Massachusetts General Laws by adding provisions that adjust
reimbursement levels based on a municipality's combined effort yield relative to its foundation
budget.
Section 3: Amendment to MGL Chapter 71, Section 89
Amend Section (gg) of MGL Chapter 71, Section 89, by adding the following provisions
at the end of Section (gg) but before Section (hh):
1. (I) If the municipality’s combined effort yield is less than or equal to 100 per cent
of the municipality’s foundation budget and reimbursement in accordance with this section is
of 2

less than 100 per cent of a municipality’s total charter tuition assessments for the current fiscal
year, then a municipality shall be reimbursed 100 per cent of the total charter sending tuition
assessments or whichever amount is greater.
2. (II) If the municipality’s combined effort yield is less than or equal to 150 per
cent of the municipality’s foundation budget but is greater than 100 per cent of the
municipality’s foundation budget, and reimbursement in accordance with this section is less than
50 per cent of a municipality’s total charter tuition assessments for the current fiscal year, then a
municipality shall be reimbursed 50 per cent of the total charter sending tuition assessments or
whichever amount is greater.
Section 3: Effective Date This Act shall take effect at the beginning of the next fiscal year
following its passage.
Legislative Declaration The Commonwealth acknowledges the financial burden that
charter school tuition assessments place on municipalities. This amendment ensures that
municipalities with lower fiscal capacity receive adequate reimbursement, thereby promoting
fairness in education funding.
of 2